Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201581-3409
Design, defined.

Design means the preparation of schematics, layouts, plans, drawings, specifications, calculations, and other diagnostic documents which show the features of an architectural or engineering project.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 9;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 9.